Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB718.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Hon. Raymond T. Book Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Born in Pittsburgh on February 14, 1925, Mr. Book was the son of the late Raymond and Margaret Book.(2) During World War II, Mr. Book served his country with honor and was awarded numerous medals.(3) After his honorable discharge, he attended Robert Morris Business College and the University of Pittsburgh before beginning his career with J&L Steel in 1948.(4) He also worked in the real estate industry for more than four decades.(5) Mr. Book turned his attention to politics in 1980 12345678910111213141516171819 when he was elected to serve on the Whitehall Borough Council.(6) In 1982, he became Representative Book upon his election to the Pennsylvania House of Representatives.(7) During his tenure as a legislator, he was a sponsor of the Organ Donor Bill.(8) After serving three consecutive terms in the House of Representatives, he turned his attention to the real estate industry and served as the Director of the Real Estate Appeals Department before serving on the Pennsylvania Real Estate Board for eight years.(9) After his retirement, he continued to serve his community by volunteering with Jefferson Hospital.(b) Designation.--The portion of Pennsylvania Route 51 from Segment 0280/Offset 0000 to Segment 0300/Offset 0570 in Whitehall Borough, Allegheny County, is designated as the Hon. Raymond T. Book Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0718PN0731 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122